Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5465.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 552c. (1) A person shall not intentionally and without
authority or permission enter or remain in or upon on premises or a
structure belonging to another person that is a key facility if,
except as provided in subsection (2), the key facility is
completely enclosed by a physical barrier of any kind, including,
but not limited to, a significant water barrier that prevents
pedestrian access, and is posted with signage as prescribed under
subsection (2). (3). As used in this subsection, section, "key
facility" means 1 or more of the following:
ELF H05457'25 (H-1) fq03x2


(a) A chemical manufacturing facility.
(b) A refinery.
(c) An electric utility facility, including, but not limited
to, a power plant, a power generation facility peaker, an electric
transmission facility, an electric station or substation, an energy
storage system, or any other facility used to support the
generation, transmission, or distribution of electricity. Electric
utility facility does not include electric transmission land or
right-of-way that is not completely enclosed, posted, and
maintained by the electric utility. As used in this subdivision,
"energy storage system" means any electric utility facility or
technology that is capable of absorbing energy, storing the energy
for a period of time, and redelivering the energy. Energy storage
system includes, but is not limited to, the following:
(i) Battery energy storage or electro-chemical systems.
(ii) Pumped storage hydroelectric facilities.
(iii) Compressed air energy storage.
(iv) Thermal energy storage.
(v) Other mechanical storage systems
(d) A water intake structure or water treatment facility.
(e) A natural gas utility facility, including, but not limited
to, an age station, compressor station, odorization facility, main
line valve, natural gas storage facility, or any other facility
used to support the acquisition, transmission, distribution, or
storage of natural gas. Natural gas utility facility does not
include gas transmission pipeline property that is not completely
enclosed, posted, and maintained by the natural gas utility.
(f) Gasoline, propane, liquid natural gas (LNG), or other fuel
terminal or storage facility.
ELF H05457'25 (H-1) fq03x2


(g) A transportation facility, including, but not limited to,
a port, railroad switching yard, or trucking terminal. As used in
this subdivision, "railroad yard" includes, but is not limited to,
rail switching yards, classification yards, intermodal facilities,
hump yards, automobile loading facilities, and rail storage yards.
(h) A pulp or paper manufacturing facility.
(i) A pharmaceutical manufacturing facility.
(j) A hazardous waste storage, treatment, or disposal
facility.
(k) A telecommunication facility, including, but not limited
to, a central office or cellular telephone tower site.
(l) A railroad tunnel.
(m) A data center.
(n) (l) A facility substantially similar to a facility,
structure, or station listed in subdivisions (a) to (k) (m) or a
resource required to submit a risk management plan under 42 USC
7412(r).
(2) Subsection (1) applies to a key facility that is a
railroad yard that is posted with signage as prescribed under
subsection (3), regardless of whether or not the railroad yard is
completely enclosed by any physical barrier.
(3) (2) A key facility shall must be posted in a conspicuous
manner against entry. The minimum letter height on the posting
signs shall must be 1 inch. Each posting sign shall must be not
less than 50 square inches, and the signs shall must be spaced to
enable a person to observe not less than 1 sign at any point of
entry upon on the property.
(4) (3) A person who violates this section is guilty of a
felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a
ELF H05457'25 (H-1) fq03x2


fine of not more than $2,500.00, or both.
(5) (4) This section does not prohibit and shall must be not
construed to prevent lawful assembly or a peaceful and orderly
petition for the redress of grievances, including, but not limited
to, a labor dispute between an employer and its employees.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days
after the date it is enacted into law.
Final Page
ELF H05457'25 (H-1) fq03x2